test/src/gt-norm-yamls/adjective-prefixes_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst

Tests:
  
  # Superlative prefix 'an-'
  
  Superlative, no assimilation needed:
    # Vowel
    walda+A+Superl: anwalda
    walda+A+Superl+Nsing: analte
    walda+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: anwaldasse
    # c
    calima+A+Superl: ancalima
    calima+A+Superl+Nsing: ancalime
    calima+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: ancalimasse
    # f
    firin+A+Superl: anfirin
    firin+A+Superl+Nsing: anfirini
    firin+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: anfirinesse
    # n
    ninquë+A+Superl: anninque
    ninquë+A+Superl+Nsing: anninqui
    ninquë+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: anninquesse
    # q
    quinna+A+Superl: anquinna
    quinna+A+Superl+Nsing: anquinne
    quinna+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: anquinnasse
    # t
    taura+A+Superl: antaura
    taura+A+Superl+Nsing: antaure
    taura+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: antaurasse
    # v
    vanya+A+Superl: anvanya
    vanya+A+Superl+Nsing: anvanye
    vanya+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: anvanyasse
    # w
    walda+A+Superl: anwalda
    walda+A+Superl+Nsing: anwalde
    walda+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: anwaldasse
    # y
    yonda+A+Superl: anyonda
    yonda+A+Superl+Nsing: anyonde
    yonda+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: anyondasse
    # ty
    tyelca+A+Superl: antyelca
    tyelca+A+Superl+Nsing: antyelce
    tyelca+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: antyelcasse

  Superlative, total assimilation:
    # l
    laurëa+A+Superl: allaurea
    laurëa+A+Superl+Nsing: allaurie
    laurëa+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: allaureasse
    # r
    rempa+A+Superl: arrempa
    rempa+A+Superl+Nsing: arrempe
    rempa+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: arrempasse
    # s
    sarta+A+Superl: assarta
    sarta+A+Superl+Nsing: assarte
    sarta+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: assartasse
    # þ
    sinda+A+Superl: aþþinda
    sinda+A+Superl+Nsing: aþþinde
    sinda+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: aþþindasse
  
  Superlative, labial assimilation:
    # p
    pahta+A+Superl: ampahta
    pahta+A+Superl+Nsing: ampahte
    pahta+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: ampahtasse
    # m
    moina+A+Superl: ammoina
    moina+A+Superl+Nsing: ammoine
    moina+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: ammoinasse
  
  Superlative, border becomes a vowel:
    # consonant cluster
    hloirëa+A+Superl: [anahloirea, an-hloirea]
    hloirëa+A+Superl+Nsing: [anahloirie, an-hloirie]
    hloirëa+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: [anahloireasse, an-hloireasse]
    nwalca+A+Superl: [anañwalca, an-ñwalca]
    nwalca+A+Superl+Nsing: [anañwalce, an-ñwalce]
    nwalca+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: [anañwalcasse, an-ñwalcasse]
  
  Superlative, following h becomes c:
    hiswa+A+Superl: anciþwa
    hiswa+A+Superl+Nsing: anciþwe
    hiswa+A+Superl+Sing+Loc: anciþwasse
